Mississippi, session 2026, HB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following words shall have the following meanings: (a) "Government" means state, county, municipal, and other political subdivision in this state. (b)  "Government employer" means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board, commission, authority, institution, or instrumentality of the state or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision in this state. (c)  "Peace Officer" means any local or state law enforcement officer, including, but not limited to, a state trooper, the sheriff of a county, sheriff deputies of a county, the chief of police of a city or town, a police officer of a city or town, a constable, or a parole officer. SECTION 2.  (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each state, county, municipality and political subdivision of the state shall be liable for any injury caused by an act or omission of a peace officer who, under color of law, violates a right under the constitution of this state or the United States. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a peace officer's employer shall indemnify its peace officers for any liability incurred by the peace officer and for any judgment or settlement entered against the peace officer for claims arising pursuant to this section; except that, if the peace officer's employer determines that the officer did not act upon a good faith and reasonable belief that the action was lawful, then the peace officer is personally liable and shall not be indemnified by the peace officer's employer for five percent (5%) of the judgment or settlement, or Twenty five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), whichever is less. (2)  If the peace officer's portion of the judgment is uncollectible from the peace officer, the peace officer's employer or personal insurance shall satisfy the full amount of the judgment or settlement. (3)  No judgment awarded under this act shall exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). (4)  An individual may seek legal, equitable, or other relief in a court of this state for a violation of the individual's right under the constitution of this state or the United States. (5)  The proper defendants in an action are the government employer and government employee(s). (6)  The provision of this act shall be excluded from: (a)  Common law doctrines of immunity, including, but not limited to, the state recognized doctrine of qualified immunity; (b)  Federally recognized doctrines of qualified immunity; (c)  Sovereign immunity, discretionary function immunity,  governmental immunity, custom or policy; or (d)  Statutory immunities and limitations on liability or damages, including, but not limited, to immunities contained in the Mississippi Tort Claims Act. (7)  The provisions of this act shall not be construed to abrogate immunity for judges and legislators at any level of government for actions taken in their judicial or legislative capacities, respectively. (8)  The provisions of this act shall not be construed to authorize class actions. Such actions are prohibited under this act. (9)  No claim shall commence any later than three (3) years from the date a claim can be brought for the deprivation of a right under the constitution of this state or the United States. (10)  The plaintiff bears the burden of proving their claim by a preponderance of the evidence. SECTION 3. When evaluating a peace officer's use of force under the constitution of the United States, the court's determination of reasonableness must be objective and made from the perspective of a reasonable government employee on the scene confronted with the immediate facts and circumstances of the claim.  The court shall recognize that a peace officer often must make split-second decisions in tense, uncertain, and rapidly evolving situations.  A court shall not determine reasonableness using hindsight or based on facts and circumstances that are later discovered. SECTION 4.  The court's order shall be supported by findings of facts and conclusions of law. The court shall make the findings of fact in a bench trial and the jury shall make them in a jury trial.  The court shall make conclusions of law. SECTION 5.  Plaintiffs who prevail under the act will be allowed to petition the court for compensatory damages.  However, plaintiffs may not petition for punitive damages. SECTION 6.  (1) In any proceeding in which a plaintiff's claim prevails, the government shall be liable for reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs. (2)  Reasonable attorney's fees include those incurred on an hourly or contingency basis, or by an attorney providing services on a pro bono basis. (3)  The court shall recognize that a plaintiff's claim prevails if the plaintiff obtains any relief the plaintiff seeks in its complaint, whether the relief is obtained via judgment, settlement or the government's voluntary change in behavior. (4)  Under this state's rules of civil procedure, the court may dismiss a frivolous claim and may award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the defendant for defending against a frivolous claim. SECTION 7.  In any instance, nothing in this act shall interfere with  the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training (BLEOST) authority to  review cases and revoke officers' state certification. SECTION 8.  (1) For any contract or agreement enacted after the effective date of this legislation and notwithstanding any other law, a court's finding that a government employee violated a right under the constitution of this state or the United States under this chapter is per se evidence that the government employer has just cause for terminating the employment of the government employee. (2)  The government's termination of a contract, agreement or employment with the government employee shall not affect the government's liability under this chapter. SECTION 9.  All documents, including complaints, judgments, settlements, and consent decrees, are subject to public disclosure. SECTION 10.  Section 11-46-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 11-46-5.  (1) Notwithstanding the immunity granted in Section 11-46-3, or the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the immunity of the state and its political subdivisions from claims for money damages arising out of the torts of such governmental entities and the torts of their employees while acting within the course and scope of their employment is hereby waived from and after July 1, 1993, as to the state, and from and after October 1, 1993, as to political subdivisions; provided, however, immunity of a governmental entity in any such case shall be waived only to the extent of the maximum amount of liability provided for in Section 11-46-15. (2)  For the purposes of this chapter an employee shall not be considered as acting within the course and scope of his employment and a governmental entity shall not be liable or be considered to have waived immunity for any conduct of its employee if the employee's conduct constituted fraud, malice, libel, slander, defamation or any criminal offense other than traffic violations. (3)  For the purposes of this chapter and not otherwise, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that any act or omission of an employee within the time and at the place of his employment is within the course and scope of his employment, except for actions described in subsection (2) of Section 73-25-33 and subsection (5) of this section. (4)  Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to waive the immunity of the state from suit in federal courts guaranteed by the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States. (5)  For purposes of this chapter, an employee shall not be considered as acting within the course and scope of his or her employment and a governmental entity shall be liable or be considered to have waived immunity for any conduct of its employee if the employee's conduct constituted a violation of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 11.  Section 11-46-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 11-46-7.  (1)  The remedy provided by this chapter against a governmental entity or its employee is exclusive of any other civil action or civil proceeding by reason of the same subject matter against the governmental entity or its employee or the estate of the employee for the act or omission which gave rise to the claim or suit; and any claim made or suit filed against a governmental entity or its employee to recover damages for any injury for which immunity has been waived under this chapter shall be brought only under the provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary. (2)  An employee may be joined in an action against a governmental entity in a representative capacity if the act or omission complained of is one for which the governmental entity may be liable, but no employee shall be held personally liable for acts or omissions occurring within the course and scope of the employee's duties.  For the purposes of this chapter an employee shall not be considered as acting within the course and scope of his employment and a governmental entity shall not be liable or be considered to have waived immunity for any conduct of its employee if the employee's conduct constituted fraud, malice, libel, slander, defamation or any criminal offense. (3)  From and after July 1, 1993, as to the state, from and after October 1, 1993, as to political subdivisions, and subject to the provisions of this chapter, every governmental entity shall be responsible for providing a defense to its employees and for the payment of any judgment in any civil action or the settlement of any claim against an employee for money damages arising out of any act or omission within the course and scope of his employment; provided, however, that to the extent that a governmental entity has in effect a valid and current certificate of coverage issued by the board as provided in Section 11-46-17, or in the case of a political subdivision, such political subdivision has a plan or policy of insurance and/or reserves which the board has approved as providing satisfactory security for the defense and protection of the political subdivision against all claims and suits for injury for which immunity has been waived under this chapter, the governmental entity's duty to indemnify and/or defend such claim on behalf of its employee shall be secondary to the obligation of any such insurer or indemnitor, whose obligation shall be primary.  The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to alter or relieve any such indemnitor or insurer of any legal obligation to such employee or to any governmental entity vicariously liable on account of or legally responsible for damages due to the allegedly wrongful error, omissions, conduct, act or deed of such employee. (4)  The responsibility of a governmental entity to provide a defense for its employee shall apply whether the claim is brought in a court of this or any other state or in a court of the United States. (5)  A governmental entity shall not be entitled to contribution or indemnification, or reimbursement for legal fees and expenses from its employee unless a court shall find that the act or omission of the employee was outside the course and scope of his employment.  Any action by a governmental entity against its employee and any action by an employee against the governmental entity for contribution, indemnification, or necessary legal fees and expenses shall be tried to the court in the same suit brought on the claim against the governmental entity or its employee. (6)  The duty to defend and to pay any judgment as provided in subsection (3) of this section shall continue after employment with the governmental entity has been terminated, if the occurrence for which liability is alleged happened within the course and scope of duty while the employee was in the employ of the governmental entity. (7)  For the purposes of this chapter and not otherwise, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that any act or omission of an employee within the time and at the place of his employment is within the course and scope of his employment. (8)  Nothing in this chapter shall enlarge or otherwise adversely affect the personal liability of an employee of a governmental entity.  Any immunity or other bar to a civil suit under Mississippi or federal law shall remain in effect.  The fact that a governmental entity may relieve an employee from all necessary legal fees and expenses and any judgment arising from the civil lawsuit shall not under any circumstances be communicated to the trier of fact in the civil lawsuit. SECTION 12.  Section 11-46-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 11-46-9.  (1)  A governmental entity and its employees acting within the course and scope of their employment or duties shall not be liable for any claim: (a)  Arising out of a legislative or judicial action or inaction, or administrative action or inaction of a legislative or judicial nature; (b)  Arising out of any act or omission of an employee of a governmental entity exercising ordinary care in reliance upon, or in the execution or performance of, or in the failure to execute or perform, a statute, ordinance or regulation, whether or not the statute, ordinance or regulation be valid; (c)  Arising out of any act or omission of an employee of a governmental entity engaged in the performance or execution of duties or activities relating to police or fire protection unless the employee acted in reckless disregard of the safety and well-being of any person not engaged in criminal activity at the time of injury; (d)  Based upon the exercise or performance or the failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or duty on the part of a governmental entity or employee thereof, whether or not the discretion be abused; (e)  Arising out of an injury caused by adopting or failing to adopt a statute, ordinance or regulation; (f)  Which is limited or barred by the provisions of any other law; (g)  Arising out of the exercise of discretion in determining whether or not to seek or provide the resources necessary for the purchase of equipment, the construction or maintenance of facilities, the hiring of personnel and, in general, the provision of adequate governmental services; (h)  Arising out of the issuance, denial, suspension or revocation of, or the failure or refusal to issue, deny, suspend or revoke any privilege, ticket, pass, permit, license, certificate, approval, order or similar authorization where the governmental entity or its employee is authorized by law to determine whether or not such authorization should be issued, denied, suspended or revoked unless such issuance, denial, suspension or revocation, or failure or refusal thereof, is of a malicious or arbitrary and capricious nature; (i)  Arising out of the assessment or collection of any tax or fee; (j)  Arising out of the detention of any goods or merchandise by any law enforcement officer, unless such detention is of a malicious or arbitrary and capricious nature; (k)  Arising out of the imposition or establishment of a quarantine, whether such quarantine relates to persons or property; (l)  Of any claimant who is an employee of a governmental entity and whose injury is covered by the Workers' Compensation Law of this state by benefits furnished by the governmental entity by which he is employed; (m)  Of any claimant who at the time the claim arises is an inmate of any detention center, jail, workhouse, penal farm, penitentiary or other such institution, regardless of whether such claimant is or is not an inmate of any detention center, jail, workhouse, penal farm, penitentiary or other such institution when the claim is filed; (n)  Arising out of any work performed by a person convicted of a crime when the work is performed pursuant to any sentence or order of any court or pursuant to laws of the State of Mississippi authorizing or requiring such work; (o)  Under circumstances where liability has been or is hereafter assumed by the United States, to the extent of such assumption of liability, including, but not limited to, any claim based on activities of the Mississippi National Guard when such claim is cognizable under the National Guard Tort Claims Act of the United States, 32 USCS 715, or when such claim accrues as a result of active federal service or state service at the call of the Governor for quelling riots and civil disturbances; (p)  Arising out of a plan or design for construction or improvements to public property, including, but not limited to, public buildings, highways, roads, streets, bridges, levees, dikes, dams, impoundments, drainage channels, diversion channels, harbors, ports, wharfs or docks, where such plan or design has been approved in advance of the construction or improvement by the legislative body or governing authority of a governmental entity or by some other body or administrative agency, exercising discretion by authority to give such approval, and where such plan or design is in conformity with engineering or design standards in effect at the time of preparation of the plan or design; (q)  Arising out of an injury caused solely by the effect of weather conditions on the use of streets and highways; (r)  Arising out of the lack of adequate personnel or facilities at a state hospital or state corrections facility if reasonable use of available appropriations has been made to provide such personnel or facilities; (s)  Arising out of loss, damage or destruction of property of a patient or inmate of a state institution; (t)  Arising out of any loss of benefits or compensation due under a program of public assistance or public welfare; (u)  Arising out of or resulting from riots, unlawful assemblies, unlawful public demonstrations, mob violence or civil disturbances; (v)  Arising out of an injury caused by a dangerous condition on property of the governmental entity that was not caused by the negligent or other wrongful conduct of an employee of the governmental entity or of which the governmental entity did not have notice, either actual or constructive, and adequate opportunity to protect or warn against; provided, however, that a governmental entity shall not be liable for the failure to warn of a dangerous condition which is obvious to one exercising due care; (w)  Arising out of the absence, condition, malfunction or removal by third parties of any sign, signal, warning device, illumination device, guardrail or median barrier, unless the absence, condition, malfunction or removal is not corrected by the governmental entity responsible for its maintenance within a reasonable time after actual or constructive notice; (x)  Arising out of the administration of corporal punishment or the taking of any action to maintain control and discipline of students, as defined in Section 37-11-57, by a teacher, assistant teacher, principal or assistant principal of a public school district in the state unless the teacher, assistant teacher, principal or assistant principal acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose or in a manner exhibiting a wanton and willful disregard of human rights or safety; or (y)  Arising out of the construction, maintenance or operation of any highway, bridge or roadway project entered into by the Mississippi Transportation Commission or other governmental entity and a company under the provisions of Section 65-43-1 or 65-43-3, where the act or omission occurs during the term of any such contract. (2)  A governmental entity shall also not be liable for any claim where the governmental entity: (a)  Is inactive and dormant; (b)  Receives no revenue; (c)  Has no employees; and (d)  Owns no property. (3)  If a governmental entity exempt from liability by subsection (2) becomes active, receives income, hires employees or acquires any property, such governmental entity shall no longer be exempt from liability as provided in subsection (2) and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 13.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.